California, session 20252026, AB1698.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 17053.65 is added to the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:17053.65. (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2029, there shall be allowed against the “net tax,” as defined in Section 17039, a credit in an amount equal to any expense paid or incurred by a qualified taxpayer for an employee obtaining a food handler card in compliance with Section 113948 of the Health and Safety Code. Code, not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per taxpayer per taxable year.(b) For purposes of this section, “qualified taxpayer” means a taxpayer that has less than 50 employees and all of the taxpayer’s employees are in compliance with Section 113948 of the Health and Safety Code.(c) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe regulations that are necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section.(d) For purposes of complying with Section 41, with respect to this section and Section 23665, the Legislature finds and declares the purpose of this tax expenditure is to offset the costs of small businesses paying for their employees to get food handler cards.(e) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. Section 23665 is added to the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:23665. (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2029, there shall be allowed against the “tax,” as defined in Section 23036, a credit in an amount equal to any expense paid or incurred by a qualified taxpayer for an employee obtaining a food handler card in compliance with Section 113948 of the Health and Safety Code. Code, not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per taxpayer per taxable year.(b) For purposes of this section, “qualified taxpayer” means a taxpayer that has less than 50 employees and all of the taxpayer’s employees are in compliance with Section 113948 of the Health and Safety Code.(c) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe regulations that are necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section.(d) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 3. This act provides for a tax levy within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect.